Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 13 Motor Passenger Carriers

39-13-1.
Definitions.

“Coordinated paratransit services” means paratransit services coordinated by the department of transportation, to be provided under a brokerage or other contractual model to provide, promote, and coordinate new or existing paratransit operations to enable all state, municipal, and private agencies access to appropriate paratransit services.

“Jitney” means and includes any motor bus or other public-service motor vehicle operated in whole or in part upon any street or highway in such manner as to afford a means of transportation similar to that afforded by a street railway company, by indiscriminately receiving or discharging passengers; or running on a regular route or over any portion thereof; or between fixed termini.

“Paratransit services” means flexible transportation services provided on a demand-responsive and advance-reservation basis, for any destination within the scope of a service program provided by a state or municipal agency, the fee for which is determined pursuant to a contract between the service provider and the state or municipal agency. Paratransit includes single or group trips or trips made on a recurring basis such as for work, school, medical, nutrition, and sheltered workshops.

“Public-service motor vehicle” shall include all motor vehicles as defined in §

31-1-3

, used for the transportation of passengers for hire.

“Transportation operator(s)” means an entity(ies) providing flexible transportation services that are operated publicly or privately, and are distinct from conventional fixed-route, fixed-schedule transit, and are generally operated with low-capacity vehicles that provide curb-to-curb or door-to-door service that typically involves transportation of elderly, disabled, low-income, or the otherwise transportation-dependent population.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-1

; P.L. 1992, ch. 279, § 1.

39-13-2.
Jitneys subject to regulation.

Every person, association, or corporation owning or operating a jitney is hereby declared a common carrier and subject as such to the jurisdiction of the division of public utilities and carriers, and while so operating, to such reasonable rules and regulations as the division may prescribe with respect to routes, fares, speed, schedules, continuity of service, and the convenience and safety of passengers and the public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-2

.

39-13-2.1.
Jitneys not subject to regulation.

Any person, association, or corporation operating a jitney, bus, or other motor vehicle as a transportation operator as defined in this chapter for the purpose of providing paratransit or coordinated paratransit services for the benefit of the citizenry of the state shall be exempted from regulation under this chapter.

Transportation operators may enter contractual agreements with third-party transportation operators to provide paratransit services and the third parties shall be similarly exempted from regulation under this chapter.

Provided, however, all transportation operators providing paratransit services shall be required to meet all driver and vehicle safety requirements as set forth in this chapter including but not limited to: (1) The same inspection standards or regulations as a jitney-registered vehicle including semi-annual safety inspections in accordance with chapter 38 of title 31; (2) That failure of a semi-annual state safety inspection shall result in suspension of the vehicle registration until such time as all defects are corrected; and (3) The requirements of §

39-13-11

. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the power of the department of administration to require additional safety or other requirements, either by regulation or contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 279, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 23, § 4.

39-13-3.
Certificate requirement for jitney operation.

No person, association, or corporation shall operate a jitney until the owner thereof shall have obtained a certificate from the division specifying the route over which the jitney may operate; the number of passengers it may carry at any one time; the service to be furnished; and that public convenience and necessity require operation over the route. Certificates issued under this chapter shall be renewed before the close of business on December 31 of each calendar year. The renewal fee shall be two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) and shall be submitted with the renewal form. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues; provided, however, that this fee shall not apply to any city or town, or any agency or department of any city or town of the state, or any nonprofit jitney service utilized for the transportation of senior citizens.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 3; P.L. 1936 (s. s.), ch. 2463; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-3

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 119; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 26, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 485, § 4.

39-13-4.
Application for certificate — Fee — Domicile of applicant.

A certificate shall be issued only after written application for a certificate, accompanied by a fee of two hundred and fifty dollars ($250), has been made by the owner of the jitney; provided, however, that this fee shall not apply to any city or town, or any agency or department of any city or town of the state, or any nonprofit jitney service utilized for the transportation of senior citizens. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. No certificate shall be issued to any person who is not a citizen resident within this state, nor to any association, unless all members of the association are citizens resident within this state, nor to any corporation, unless either all stockholders thereof are citizens resident within this state or the corporation has been created by a special act of the general assembly, upon petition for the same, the pendency of which petition shall be notified in such manner as the general assembly may by general law or special act prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 3; P.L. 1936 (s. s.), ch. 2463; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-4

; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 33; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 14; P.L. 1986, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 119; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 26, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 485, § 3.

39-13-5.
Hearing on application for certificate.

Upon receipt of an application, the division shall fix a time and place of a hearing thereon and shall give notice of the pendency of the application and of the time and place of the hearing thereon to the applicant, to the mayor of each city and the president of the town council of each town in or through which the applicant desires to operate, and to any common carrier operating over any portion of a route or over a route substantially parallel thereto, and shall give a public hearing upon the petition. Any town or city within which or between which, and any other town or city to which a common carrier is furnishing service, may, at any time after the certificate of public convenience and necessity has been issued, bring a written petition to the division in respect to routes, fares, speed, schedules, continuity of service, and the convenience and safety of passengers and the public. Thereupon, the division shall fix a time and place for a hearing upon the petition and shall mail a notice thereof to the parties in interest and give such other notice thereof as the division may deem proper by advertisement. The division may revoke or amend any certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-5

.

39-13-6.
Jitney operation by railroad or street railway company.

Any street railway company incorporated under the laws of this state and operating a street railway within this state or any railroad company incorporated under the laws of this state and operating a railroad in this state may acquire, own, and operate jitneys, subject to the provisions of this chapter and to all other laws relating to the registration, licensing, bonding, and operating of jitneys.

No street railway company shall substitute for any existing trolley service, jitney service over a route over and along the same highway occupied by a line of street or other railway, or over a route that will serve the same or nearly the same communities served by a line of street or other railway, until the division shall, after due notice to the towns and cities affected thereby and a public hearing thereon, if it appears that the public interest will be served thereby, have authorized a substitution of service; and the street railway company shall thereafter continue the jitney service until, after like notice and hearing and for cause shown, the division shall have authorized the abandonment thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 5; P.L. 1925, ch. 635, § 1; P.L. 1928, ch. 1174, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-6

.

39-13-7, 39-13-8.
[Repealed.]

39-13-9.
Proof of financial responsibility.

The owner of every jitney shall, before operating or continuing to operate a jitney on the public highways of this state, furnish to the division of public utilities and carriers a certificate of insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state, showing that the owner has a policy that insures against liability for injury to persons and damage to property that may be caused by the operation of the jitney, such policy to provide for indemnity in the sum of not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) combined single limit or its equivalent split level.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 15; P.L. 1928, ch. 1141, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-9

; P.L. 2006, ch. 579, § 3.

39-13-10.
Display of certificate.

The owner or operator of every jitney shall display in a conspicuous place in the jitney the certificate issued pursuant to this chapter or a certified copy thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-10

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 115.

39-13-11.
Registration and licensing of vehicles and operators — CPR training requirement.

Upon the granting of a certificate of public convenience and necessity as provided in this chapter, the division of motor vehicles shall have jurisdiction over the registration of any jitney and over the licensing of its operator and its lighting, safety, and sanitary conditions.

Effective January 1, 1986, no new license shall be issued to a jitney operator unless he or she has presented evidence of satisfactory completion of a cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training program. The program is to be approved by the American Heart Association, Rhode Island Affiliate, Inc., or the American Red Cross Association, Inc.; provided, however, that any person licensed as a jitney operator prior to January 1, 1986, shall not be required to complete the training program.

This section shall not apply to operators of “taxicabs” or “limited public motor vehicles” as defined in chapter 14 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-11

; P.L. 1985, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 115.

39-13-12.
License plates.

Every jitney shall carry markers to be furnished by the division of motor vehicles, which markers shall indicate that the vehicle is licensed for jitney service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-12

.

39-13-12.1.
Issuance of a permit to interstate carriers.

Every motor carrier engaged in transporting passengers over the highways of this state for compensation in interstate commerce, shall file an application with the administrator for a permit of registration. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Upon a showing by the carrier that it has been authorized by the Interstate Commerce Commission to conduct an operation into, from, within, or through this state, and that the carrier is in compliance with all other requirements of this chapter, the administrator shall issue a permit of registration to the carrier as soon as possible and the carrier shall not so operate in interstate commerce unless and until the permit of registration shall have been issued. The motor carrier shall be required to file with the administrator only that portion of its interstate authority permitting operations within the borders of this state, and the motor carrier shall not be required to file with the administrator emergency or temporary operating authority having a duration of thirty (30) consecutive days or less, if the carrier has registered its interstate authority and registered and identified its vehicles under the provisions of this chapter. The administrator shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations governing the registration of interstate authority. Each intrastate motor carrier holding a common-carrier certificate from the administrator is hereby granted the right to operate motor vehicles in interstate commerce in the transportation of passengers for compensation, as authorized by the Interstate Commerce Commission without obtaining a permit of registration from the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 15; P.L. 1986, ch. 34, § 1.

39-13-12.2.
Registration and identification of vehicles.

Every interstate motor carrier engaged in the transportation of passengers for compensation over the highways of this state, subject to the provisions of this chapter, shall apply to the administrator for the issuance of a vehicle identification device for the registration and identification of vehicles. The application shall be accompanied by a filing fee in the amount of eight dollars ($8.00) for each identification device applied for. All intrastate carriers shall be assessed twenty dollars ($20.00) for each identification device for which an application is made; provided, however, that this fee shall not apply to any city or town, or any agency or department of any city or town of the state, or any nonprofit jitney service utilized for the transportation of senior citizens. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. The identification device shall be furnished annually to every carrier whose duty it shall be to apply therefor. It shall be unlawful for any motor vehicle to be engaged in transporting passengers for compensation in either intrastate or interstate commerce without the owner thereof having applied for and received the required identification device, unless the vehicle is exempted from the provisions of this chapter. Each identification device shall be accompanied by a registration card issued by the administrator which shall be in the possession of the vehicle’s driver when the vehicle is in operation. Transfers of the identification device from one vehicle to another are hereby prohibited. The administrator in his or her discretion may refuse to reissue the identification device to the holder of any certificate, permit, or permit of registration, pending any complaint or hearing upon the question of revocation or suspension or in which the question is involved. The administrator shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations governing the registration and identification of motor vehicles authorized for operation under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 15; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 115.

39-13-13.
[Repealed.]

39-13-14.
Administrative powers.

The division is authorized to make such rules and regulations, to hold such hearings, and to issue such certificates as the provisions of §§

39-13-1

—

39-13-6

and §§

39-13-1

0 —

39-13-16

may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-14

.

39-13-15.
Penalty for violations.

Any person or the officers of any association or corporation, who shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any order, rule, or regulation adopted or established by the division under the provisions of this chapter, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned not more than sixty (60) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-15

.

39-13-16.
Severability.

Each section of this chapter and every part of each section are hereby declared to be independent sections; and the holding of any section or sections, or part or parts thereof, to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause, shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2221, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 254, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 125, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

39-13-16

.

39-13-17.
Exemptions.

Every person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of public passenger transportation in the state of Rhode Island shall be and remain exempt from gasoline and diesel engine fuel taxes for such fuel as is consumed by its public passenger buses used exclusively in its public passenger transportation system, as distinguished from buses used for charter, contract, lease, or school transportation service, and shall be and remain exempt from the motor vehicle registration fees for each public passenger bus used exclusively in its public passenger transportation system as distinguished from buses used for charter, contract, lease, or school transportation service, as provided in §

31-6-1

, as amended, in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 166, § 1.